uz.aff
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizniku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizning . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizningmi . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizningdir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizningda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizningku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizga . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizgami . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizgada . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdami . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdada . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlarimizdaku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizni . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringiznimi . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringiznidir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringiznida . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringiznidirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizniku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizning . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizningmi . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizningdir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizningda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizningku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizga . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizgami . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizgada . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdami . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdada . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 lmayotganlaringizdaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimni . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimnimi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimnidir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimnida . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimniku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimning . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimningmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimningdir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimningda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimningku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimga . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimgami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimgadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimgada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimgaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdandir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdanda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdanku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimdaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganini . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganinimi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganinidir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganinida . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganinidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganinimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganiniku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganining . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganiningmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganiningdir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganiningda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganiningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganiningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganiningku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganiga . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganigami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganigadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganigada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganigadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganigamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganigaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidandir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidanda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidanku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganida . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganidaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizni . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimiznimi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimiznidir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimiznida . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimiznidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizniku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizning . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizningmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizningdir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizningda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizningku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizga . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizgami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizgada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganimizdaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizni . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingiznimi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingiznidir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingiznida . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingiznidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizniku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizning . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizningmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizningdir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizningda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizningku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizga . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizgami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizgada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganingizdaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimni . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimnimi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimnidir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimnida . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimniku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimning . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimningmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimningdir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimningda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimningku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimga . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimgami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimgadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimgada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimgaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdandir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdanda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdanku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarimdaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarini . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarinimi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarinidir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarinida . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarinidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarinimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlariniku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarining . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlariningmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlariningdir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlariningda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlariningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlariningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlariningku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlariga . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarigami . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarigadir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarigada . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarigadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarigamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlarigaku . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlaridan . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlaridanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlaridandir . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlaridanda . 
SFX Z 0 shyotganlaridandirda . 
