uz.dic
avavla/Z
avrala/Z
ayovsira/Z
azobla/Z
ayla/Z
alakla/Z
alasla/Z
albanchala/Z
aljira/Z
alohidala/Z
angangla/Z
andavala/Z
anqovsira/Z
argumeyatla/Z
arqonla/Z
arshinla/Z
astarla/Z
ata/Z
afsunla/Z
achinqira/Z
bag’illa/Z
bayonla/Z
balzamla/Z
barkashla/Z
basla/Z
bahola/Z
beja/Z
bezbezla/Z
bela/Z
beloro’schala/Z
betonla/Z
bigizla/Z
bidirla/Z
bijirla/Z
biqilla/Z
biljira/Z
biltangla/Z
bitla/Z
bog’ichla/Z
bozilla/Z
bolg’ala/Z
bosinqira/Z
boshqirdchala/Z
boshoqla/Z
bug’la/Z
bo’zla/Z
bo’yla/Z
bulavkala/Z
bulg’a/Z
buntla/Z
bo’ra/Z
burka/Z
burmala/Z
bo’ro’qsa/Z
buta/Z
butra/Z
bushla/Z
vag’illa/Z
vadirla/Z
vajirla/Z
vakilla/Z
vaqirla/Z
vangilla/Z
vang’irla/Z
varilla/Z
vasiqala/Z
vashvashla/Z
vershokla/Z
vijvijla/Z
vizilla/Z
vintla/Z
vitvitla/Z
vovilla/Z
voyla/Z
voronkala/Z
gazakla/Z
galdirakla/Z
gandirakla/Z
gibridla/Z
gizgizla/Z
grekchala/Z
guvla/Z
gudronla/Z
gumonsira/Z
gupilla/Z
gurkura/Z
gurungla/Z
davrala/Z
dakirla/Z
dang’ylla/Z
darangla/Z
dastmolla/Z
depsai/Z
didla/Z
dikkakla/Z
ding’irla/Z
distillyatsiyala/Z
dozala/Z
dori/Z
do’g’ovla/Z
do’i/Z
dukurla/Z
dumala/Z
do’ng’illa/Z
dupurla/Z
durustla/Z
yog’la/Z
yozilinqira/Z
yoqinqira/Z
yelimla/Z
yelpilla/Z
ye/Z
yondamala/Z
yorlaqa/Z
yotinqira/Z
jabduqla/Z
jag’irla/Z
jalangla/Z
jarangla/Z
jivirla/Z
jiqilla/Z
jilola/Z
jing’illa/Z
jirilla/Z
jiyakla/Z
juvoldizla/Z
jo’na/Z
juftla/Z
zangla/Z
zararla/Z
zaxala/Z
zing’illa/Z
zirvakla/Z
zirhla/Z
zorilla/Z
zuvilla/Z
zo’rla/Z
ivirsira/Z
izzatla/Z
izohla/Z
yig’na/Z
yiltira/Z
ilvira/Z
ildamla/Z
ilkilla/Z
imla/Z
ingilla/Z
inda/Z
ipaksi/Z
yrdoqla/Z
isbotla/Z
iskanala/Z
isrofla/Z
yo’la/Z
yo’rg’ala/Z
ifodala/Z
ichkarila/Z
ishqorla/Z
ishorala/Z
kavsharla/Z
kalavala/Z
kalkala/Z
karilla/Z
karchla/Z
kemti/Z
kepchi/Z
kizakla/Z
kirtilla/Z
kishna/Z
klizmala/Z
koyi/Z
konservala/Z
kosala/Z
kudungla/Z
ko’zla/Z
ko’kla/Z
kulumsira/Z
ko’ndalangla/Z
kurakla/Z
kurkilla/Z
ko’sakla/Z
kufla/Z
qabzamla/Z
qavatla/Z
qadalinqnra/Z
qayra/Z
qaqaqla/Z
qaqsha/Z
qalqi/Z
qamsa/Z
qanqi/Z
qarg’ab-siqta/Z
qari/Z
qasirla/Z
qatirla/Z
qatorla/Z
qashi/Z
qiyoqla/Z
qizi/Z
qiymala/Z
qiyra/Z
qilichla/Z
qiltilla/Z
qirg’ichla/Z
qirpila/Z
qirtishla/Z
qisimla/Z
qista/Z
qihqihla/Z
qiyala/Z
qopla/Z
qo’zi/Z
qo’llab-quvvatla/Z
qo’ltiqla/Z
qurayla/Z
qo’rg’oshinla/Z
qo’rqinqira/Z
quruqla/Z
qur-haytla/Z
qo’tonla/Z
qo’shoqla/Z
lalaqla/Z
laxtala/Z
likilla/Z
limilla/Z
lirkilla/Z
literla/Z
loyihala/Z
longla/Z
loyalai/Z
magnitla/Z
majaqla/Z
maydala/Z
ma’ra/Z
mensi/Z
mijg’ila/Z
miqrozla/Z
miliqla/Z
ming’irla/Z
mita/Z
modernizatsiyala/Z
muvofiqla/Z
mo’ychinakle/Z
mo’ljalla/Z
mumiyola/Z
munki/Z
muhrla/Z
navla/Z
naqdla/Z
namla/Z
nasihatla/Z
naftalinla/Z
neytralla/Z
nikohla/Z
nilla/Z
nishonla/Z
nomerla/Z
no’qi/Z
nhila/Z
obkashla/Z
ogohla/Z
oyoqla/Z
oqla/Z
olqishla/Z
onamla/Z
oriqla/Z
oxirla/Z
ohohla/Z
oshla/Z
paketla/Z
palidla/Z
panella/Z
parafinla/Z
parilla/Z
part-partla/Z
patakla/Z
peshla/Z
piqirla/Z
piltala/Z
pixla/Z
pishilla/Z
platinala/Z
poykupla/Z
polimerla/Z
popilla/Z
porilla/Z
pressla/Z
pudla/Z
pulla/Z
po’piyeala/Z
pufla/Z
raqamla/Z
rezbala/Z
ruschala/Z
sava/Z
sakra/Z
sandiroqla/Z
sarishtala/Z
selkilla/Z
sehrla/Z
siqta/Z
sirkala/Z
sovuqsira/Z
sortla/Z
suvsa/Z
suqla/Z
so’rg’ichla/Z
so’chukto/Z
tayfinla/Z
taqa/Z
tala/Z
tanakorla/Z
tapirla/Z
tasvirla/Z
tafsilla/Z
tahqirla/Z
ta’qibla/Z
tengla/Z
termachila/Z
tikkala/Z
tilsimla/Z
tini/Z
tirgakla/Z
tirsilla/Z
tie/Z
toqila/Z
tortqila/Z
to’g’ramchila/Z
to’kisla/Z
to’lg’a/Z
to’ng’illa/Z
turkmanchala/Z
tusla/Z
to’xta/Z
uvoqla/Z
uza/Z
o’yna/Z
o’qla/Z
o’mrovla/Z
urinla/Z
o’rug’la/Z
o’ta/Z
uhla/Z
uchtala/Z
fakturala/Z
xaltala/Z
xashakla/Z
xirilla/Z
xmrxirla/Z
xorla/Z
xumla/Z
xushla/Z
chayqa/Z
chaqmoqla/Z
chambarla/Z
chapilla/Z
charxla/Z
chekichla/Z
chig’illa/Z
chiyilla/Z
chiqilla/Z
chimla/Z
chinla/Z
chirma/Z
chovla/Z
chorchila/Z
chug’urla/Z
cho’qmorla/Z
churqira/Z
cho’chi/Z
shakarla/Z
shang’illa/Z
shataksira/Z
shig’ala/Z
shiqirla/Z
shimi/Z
shirachla/Z
shla/Z
shodala/Z
sho’lpilla/Z
egarla/Z
ekkala/Z
elab-yasqa/Z
elii/Z
elovsira/Z
emakla/Z
enla/Z
eski/Z
e’zozla/Z
yapaloqla/Z
yasa/Z
